Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 4-103.1, as
amended by Section 14, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (26 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 4-103.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 4-103.1. A. A qualified elector may apply to register
to vote or update a registration to vote by:


Req. No. 11764 Page 1

1. Delivering by mail or otherwise a completed voter
registration application to the State Election Board or any county
election board;
2. Completing a voter registration application in person with
any official of an agency described in Section 4-109.2 of this
title;
3. Completing a voter registration application in person as
part of an application for issuance, renewal or change of address
for a driver license or issuance of a state identification card
issued pursuant to Section 6-105 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes with a designated representative of Service Oklahoma; or
4. Completing a voter registration application electronically
as provided in Section 4-109.4 of this title.; or
4. The process outlined in Section 2 of this act.
B. The secretary of the county election board for the county of
the applicant's residence shall send to each applicant by
nonforwardable, first-class United States mail a notice of the
disposition of the application. Notice mailing costs shall be paid
by the county. Provided, the Secretary of the State Election Board
may authorize such notices to be sent by electronic means for voter
registration applications submitted electronically.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-103.2 of Title 26, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 11764 Page 2

Applicants for issuance, renewal, or change of address for a
driver license or issuance of a state identification card issued
pursuant to Section 6-105 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes with
a designated representative of Service Oklahoma, shall be
automatically registered to vote and the State Election Board shall
issue a voter identification card.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-103.3 of Title 26, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Minor applicants for issuance of a driver license or
issuance of a state identification card issued pursuant to Section
6-105 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes with a designated
representative of Service Oklahoma, who are older than sixteen (16)
years of age, shall be allowed to pre-register to vote by providing
the same necessary information required to register to vote.
B. Upon turning eighteen (18) years of age, the pre-registered
voter shall be automatically registered, and the State Election
Board shall issue a voter identification card.
C. The State Election Board and Service Oklahoma are permitted
to make rules necessary to carry out the purpose of this act.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11764 MJ 01/07/25

Req. No. 11764 Page 3